Utah statutes.
53-13-111.   Peace officers serving in a reserve or auxiliary capacity.
(1) (a)  Nothing in this chapter shall preclude any law enforcement agency of
the state or any of its political subdivisions from utilizing a sworn and
certified peace officer in a reserve or auxiliary capacity.
(b) A reserve or auxiliary officer has peace officer authority only while
engaged in the reserve or auxiliary activities authorized by the chief or
administrator of the agency the officer serves and shall only exercise that
spectrum of peace officer authority:
(i)  that the supervising agency is empowered to delegate; and
(ii)  for which the officer has been trained and certified.
(2)  While serving as a nonpaid volunteer in a reserve or auxiliary capacity,
or working part-time for fewer hours than that which would qualify the officer
as an "employee" under state or federal law, a peace officer is entitled to
benefits in accordance with Title 67, Chapter 20, Volunteer Government Workers
Act.
(3)  The agency the reserve or auxiliary officer serves shall ensure that the
officer meets the basic and in-service training requirements of the peace
officer classification in which the officer will function.
